District of Columbia statutes.
6-1132

Establishment of Advisory Board.

The Mayor, with the advice and consent of the Council, shall appoint an uncompensated Historic Rhodes Tavern Advisory Board of 7 residents of the District of Columbia. The Board shall be composed of 2 historians with expertise in local District of Columbia history, an architect, an architectural historian, an attorney, an economist with expertise in the field of real estate development, and a lay person. Board members shall be appointed to 2-year terms. The Board shall continue in existence until the Mayor and the Council determine that the objectives of the policy declared in § 6-1131 have been fully attained, and that the Board has fulfilled its duties as outlined in § 6-1133.

Mar. 15, 1984, D.C. Law 5-69, § 3, 31 DCR 445
1981 Ed., § 5-1022.